California statutes. Water Code
Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 21166, a director may participate in any plan for group insurance, group annuities, social security, medical and hospital service or any other authorized program which has been adopted and carried into effect for the benefit of all such officers and employees, including directors, as accept the same and authorize the board to make any necessary deductions from their compensation for payment of a portion of the premium thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 142.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Deputies and Employees [21185. - 21190.]

21185.

The board shall:

(a) Employ agents, officers, and employees as required.

(b) Prescribe their duties and fix their salaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21186.

The board shall:

(a) Approve and reject as to number deputies of elective and appointive officers.

(b) Remove any deputies for good cause or for lack of work or funds.

(c) Fix and alter the salaries of all deputies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21187.

The treasurer and collector may appoint as many deputies within the number allowed by the board as may be necessary for the discharge of the duties of their offices, the deputies to hold office at the pleasure of the appointing officer and subject to the powers of the board. Appointments shall be in writing and filed in the office of the district. These deputies shall take and file an oath in the manner required of their principals before assuming the duties of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21188.

The board shall allow the assessor as many deputies, to be appointed by him, as will in the judgment of the board enable him to complete the assessment between the first Monday in March and the first Monday in August each year. The compensation shall be fixed by the board for each deputy for the time actually engaged; provided, that no allowance shall be made but for work performed between the first Monday in March and the first Monday in August.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1206.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.

The board may adopt and carry into effect a contract or contracts of group insurance, a system of group annuities, a system of medical and hospital service, or any two or more of these, for the benefit of such of the officers, including directors, and employees of the district as accept the same and who have authorized the board to make any necessary deductions from their compensation for the payment of a portion of the premium thereon. Contracts of group insurance, systems of group annuities, or systems of medical and hospital service, which include benefits to dependents of officers and employees or retired officers and employees are contracts of group insurance, systems of group annuities, or systems of medical and hospital service for the benefit of officers and employees for the purposes of this section. The board may make such deductions, and may pay the remainder of such premiums from any funds of the district not required to be devoted to a specific purpose. The board may pay such portion of the premiums thereon or attributable thereto as it determines to be advisable. The board may arrange or contract for a contract or contracts of group insurance, a system of group annuities, or a system of medical and hospital service, or any two or more of these, with any private or public agency, nonprofit membership corporation, or any insurance company or agent authorized by or pursuant to law to transact such business within this State. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the provisions of Chapter 250, Statutes of 1939, or of Section 1157 of the Government Code insofar as such provisions apply to districts and officers and employees thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 211.)
-------------------------------------------

21190.

Employees of districts are permanent employees if employed to fill positions which, in the judgment of the board, normally require more than six months employment in each year. Employees employed for temporary or indefinite periods are temporary employees for any period up to six months and thereafter, unless designated as permanent employees by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1277.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Misconduct [21196. - 21196.]

21196.

For any wilful violation of any express duty herein provided for by any officer herein named he shall be subject to removal from office by proceedings brought in the superior court of the office county by any assessment payer of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Selecting Officers in Certain Cases [21265. - 21285.]



  ARTICLE 1. Appointments to Fill Vacancies [21265. - 21266.]

21265.

The board of supervisors of the office county shall fill by appointment vacancies in the offices of directors, provided that any such appointed directors shall be required to run for election in the next succeeding general district election.

If within 60 days after a vacancy on the board of directors occurs the board of supervisors has failed to fill such vacancy, a special election may be called by the board of directors and held in the division affected, for the purpose of filling such vacancy. In the event there are more than two candidates at such special election, only a plurality will be required for election. The candidate elected at such special election shall fill the unexpired term of the vacating director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 840, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

21265.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all vacancies on the board of directors elected pursuant to Section 21551 shall be filled pursuant to Section 1780 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------

21266.

A board shall fill by appointment vacancies in the offices of assessor, collector, and treasurer. If the board fails to make an appointment within 40 days, the board of supervisors of the office county shall make the appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Appointments in Certain Districts [21285. - 21285.]

21285.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any district where there are not more than 15 voters at such time as the publication of notice of a general district election, no such general district election shall be held, and all offices shall be filled by appointment pursuant to Section 10515 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 227.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. The Board [21375. - 21387.]

21375.

On the first Tuesday after the original directors qualify, and on the day on which the board holds its first regular monthly meeting after the first Friday in December of the year in which a general district election is held, the directors shall meet and organize as a board and may transact any other business of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1195, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21376.

At its organization meeting the board shall elect a president from its members and appoint a secretary, who shall each hold office during the pleasure of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21377.

The board shall hold a regular meeting on the first Tuesday of each month at the district office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21377.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 21377 of this code or Section 54954 of the Government Code or any other provision of law, the Board of Directors of the Tri-Dam Project, which is composed of the directors of the Oakdale Irrigation District and the South San Joaquin Irrigation District, may hold no more than four regular meetings annually at a Tri-Dam Project
 office that is located in Sonora, California, or Strawberry, California, or within 30 miles of either city.

(2) The Board of Directors of the Tri-Dam Project shall adopt, at a regular Tri-Dam Project meeting, a resolution that designates Tri-Dam Project office locations.

(b) The notice and conduct of these meetings shall comply with the provisions of the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 26, Sec. 1.   (AB 2748)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21378.

The board, however, may by resolution entered upon its minutes fix any day of the month for its regular monthly meeting, or if more than one regular meeting is to be held each month it may fix the days for such regular meetings. When more than one regular meeting is held each month, the day of the first such meeting in January is the regular monthly meeting day in January for the purposes of this division. The change shall not be effective until the resolution proposing it has been published once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper published in the office county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

21382.

All meetings of the board shall be public and shall be conducted in accordance with the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of TItle 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 83, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

21383.

The number of directors required to constitute a quorum of the board and to concur on all questions except a motion to adjourn or a motion to adjourn to a stated time is three except in districts where there are only three offices of director, in which case the required number is two.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21384.

A smaller number of directors than a quorum may adjourn from day to day.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21385.

The board except as otherwise specifically provided has the power and it shall be its duty to manage and conduct the business and affairs of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21386.

At its organization meeting, the board may elect, in addition to a president, a vice president who shall have the power to perform all the duties of the president in the absence of the president, or in the event of his inability to perform such duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 698.)
-------------------------------------------

21387.

When the president of the board is absent or unable to act at any meeting of the board and no vice president has been elected, the majority of the board may elect a president pro tempore from its members, who shall have the power to perform all the duties of the president of the board until he is replaced or until the president of the board returns to the performance of his duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 698.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. District Office [21400. - 21405.]

21400.

The office of each district shall be established and kept at a fixed place, determined by its board, which place need not be within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21401.

The board shall fix the time during which the office of the district shall be open to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21402.

All records of the district shall be open to public inspection during the hours when the office of the district is open to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21403.

A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

21404.

The board shall adopt a seal for the district.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 21403 by Stats. 1955, Ch. 610.)
-------------------------------------------

21405.

The board of a district in existence on the effective date of this section shall file a certificate with the Secretary of State on or before January 1, 1964, listing:

(a) The name of the district.

(b) The date of formation.

(c) The county or counties in which the district is located, and a description of the boundaries of the district, or reference to a map showing such boundaries, which map shall be attached to the certificate, or reference to the county recorder’s office where a description of such boundaries has been recorded.

If the order declaring the district formed contains all of the information required to be in the certificate, the board may file a copy of the order in lieu of the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. ELECTIONS [21550. - 21935.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [21550. - 21608.]



  ARTICLE 1. Divisions and Methods of Electing Directors [21550. - 21562.5.]

21550.

Each district shall contain five divisions unless otherwise provided by the more recent of:

(a) The order on final hearing on the formation petition.

(b) An order made pursuant to this article.

(c) An order made pursuant to Article 2 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21551.

Directors shall be elected by the division each represents unless otherwise provided by the more recent of:

(a) The order on final hearing on the formation petition.

(b) An order made pursuant to this article.

(c) An order made pursuant to Article 2 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21552.

As provided in this article the number of divisions may be changed to three or five or the method of electing directors may be changed to election by the district at large or by divisions, or both changes may be made simultaneously.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21552.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 21550, 21551 and 21552, the local agency formation commission, in approving either a consolidation of districts or the reorganization of two or more districts into a single irrigation district may, pursuant to subdivisions (k) and (n) of Section 56886 of the Government Code, increase the number of directors to serve on the board of directors of the consolidated or reorganized district to 7, 9, or 11, who shall be members of the board of directors of the districts to be consolidated or reorganized as of the effective date of the consolidation or reorganization.

(b) Upon the expiration of the terms of the members of the board of directors of the consolidated district, or a district reorganized as described in subdivision (a), whose terms first expire following the effective date of the consolidation or reorganization, the total number of members on the board of directors shall be reduced until the number equals the number of members permitted by the principal act of the consolidated or reorganized district, or any larger number as may be specified by the local agency formation commission in approving the consolidation or reorganization.

(c) In addition to the powers granted under Section 1780 of the Government Code, in the event of a vacancy on the board of directors of the consolidated district or a district reorganized as described in subdivision (a) at which time the total number of directors is greater than five, the board of directors may, by majority vote of the remaining members of the board, choose not to fill the vacancy. In that event, the total membership of the board of directors shall be reduced by one board member. Upon making the determination not to fill a vacancy, the board of directors shall notify the board of supervisors of its decision.

(d) For the purposes of this section: “consolidation” means consolidation, as defined in Section 56030 of the Government Code; “district” or “special district” means district or special district, as defined in Section 56036 of the Government Code; and “reorganization” means reorganization, as defined in Section 56073 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 172, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

21553.

The board shall order a change in the number of divisions or the method of electing directors, or both, or increase the number of directors from three to five in a district without divisions, if a petition therefor, signed by a majority of the holders of title to all of the land who are also the holders of title to a majority in value of the land, is filed in the district office at least 85 days before a general district election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 212, Sec. 1.   Effective July 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

21554.

The board shall submit at a general district election or at a special election a proposal for a change in the number of divisions or the method of electing directors or both when either:

(a) At least 120 days before the general district election a petition for the submission of a proposal therefor set forth in the petition, signed by at least 500 holders of title to land who are also the holders of title to at least 20 percent in value of all of the land, is filed in the district office.

(b) At least 90 days before the general district election the board adopts a resolution for the submission of a proposal therefor set forth in the resolution. 

(c) The board by resolution calls a special election to be held in the district for submission of a proposal therefor set forth in the resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 209.)
-------------------------------------------

21555.

With regard to submitting a proposal at the general district election, the notices required by Section 12112 of the Elections Code shall contain a statement of the change or changes proposed to appear on the ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 588, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

21555.5.

(a) Notice of a special election called pursuant to Section 21554 shall specify the purpose of the election and the day, hours, and polling places in each precinct for holding the election, and shall be posted in three public places in each election precinct in the district for at least 20 days and published in a newspaper published in the county once a week for at least three successive weeks.

(b) The election shall be held and the result determined and declared as nearly as practicable in conformity with general district elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 209.)
-------------------------------------------

21556.

Each proposal shall be stated on the ballot, and the method of voting on it shall be as nearly as practicable in conformity with the provisions relating to bond elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21557.

If a proposal receives the approval of a majority of the voters voting on it in the district and also a majority of the voters voting on it in each of a majority of the divisions, the board shall order the change or changes in accordance with the proposal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21558.

If an order made pursuant to this article changes the method of electing directors, all directors thereafter elected in the district shall be elected as provided in the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21559.

If an order made pursuant to this article changes the number of divisions, the board shall forthwith redivide the district into the number of divisions specified in the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21560.

If an order made pursuant to this article changes the number of divisions, the terms of office of all directors shall expire at noon on the first Friday in December following the next general district election after the order, and the directors elected at that election shall be equal in number to the number of divisions as changed and these directors shall at their first meeting classify themselves and determine the length of their respective terms in the manner provided in subdivision (c) of Section 10505 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 229.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

21561.

Notwithstanding Sections 21550 and 21551, or any other provision of law to the contrary, directors of the Jackson Valley Irrigation District shall be nominated and elected at large.

All vacancies in the offices of directors of the Jackson Valley Irrigation District shall be filled pursuant to Section 1780 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------

21562.

Notwithstanding Section 21550, if a district contains no divisions and the board consists of three members, without establishing divisions the district may increase the number of directors from three to five by following the procedure set forth in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 178.)
-------------------------------------------

21562.5.

(a) This section applies to the Alta Irrigation District.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 21550, the board of directors of the district may adopt a resolution that increases the number of directors and the divisions from which they are elected from five to seven in accordance with this section.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 21383, if the number of district directors is increased from five to seven pursuant to this section, the number of directors required to constitute a quorum of the board and to concur on all questions, except a motion to adjourn or a motion to adjourn to a stated time, is four.

(d) (1) The board of directors shall, by resolution, adjust the boundaries of any divisions so that the divisions are, as far as practicable, equal in population and comply with the applicable provisions of Section 1973 of Title 42 of the United States Code, as amended. In establishing the boundaries of the district, the board may give consideration to all of the following factors:

(A) Topography.

(B) Geography.

(C) Cohesiveness, contiguity, integrity, and compactness of territory.

(D) Community of interest of the district.

(2) The resolution requires the vote of not less than a majority of the directors for adoption.

(3) At the time of, or after, any annexation of territory to the district, the board of directors shall designate, by resolution, the division of which the annexed territory shall be a part.

(4) No change in division boundaries may be made within 180 days preceding the election of any director.

(5) (A) A change in division boundaries shall not affect the term of office of any director.

(B) If division boundaries are adjusted, the director of the division whose boundaries have been adjusted, shall continue to be the director of the division bearing the number of his or her division as formerly comprised until the office becomes vacant by means of term expiration or otherwise, whether or not the director is a resident within the boundaries of the division as adjusted.

(6) The successor to the office in a division whose boundaries have been adjusted shall be a resident and voter of that division.

(7) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit or restrict the district from adjusting the boundaries of any divisions whenever the governing body of the district determines that a sufficient change in population has occurred that makes it desirable in the opinion of the governing body to adjust the boundaries of any divisions, or whenever any territory is added to or excluded from the district.

(e) (1) Before considering the adoption of a resolution pursuant to subdivision (b), the board of directors shall provide at least 45 days notice of the public hearing at which the board proposes to act on the resolution. The notice of the public hearing shall be provided by placing a display advertisement of at least one-eighth page in a newspaper of general circulation in each county and incorporated city in which territory of the district is located for three weeks pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code. The public hearing shall be held at least 45 days after the first publication of the notice.

(2) The notice required by paragraph (1) shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) A statement that the board of directors will consider a resolution to change from five to seven the number of directors of the district and the divisions from which they are elected.

(B) The phone number and address of an individual that interested persons may contact to receive additional information about the resolution.

(C) The date, time, and location of the public hearing.

(D) Notice that the resolution will be effective for the next district elections occurring at least 180 days after adoption of the resolution unless a petition protesting the resolution containing the signatures of not less than 10 percent of the registered qualified voters of the district is filed with the secretary of the district within 30 days from the date of the adoption of the resolution in the same manner and subject to the same requirements as are set forth in Sections 3754, 3755, and 3755.5 of the Elections Code, except that all elections referred to in those sections and officers of the county mentioned in those sections shall be construed to refer to general or special district elections and to comparable officers of the district; and the heading of the proposed referendum shall be in substantially the following form: “Referendum Against a Resolution Passed by the Board of Directors of the Alta Irrigation District Changing From Five to Seven the Number of Directors of the District and the Divisions From Which They Are Elected.”

(f) This section shall become operative only if Assembly Bill 2536 of the 1993–94 Regular Session is not enacted or does not become operative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1134, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Note: The operational condition in subd. (f) was satisfied (before Jan. 1, 1995).)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Abolition and Reestablishment of Divisions [21575. - 21605.]

21575.

Any district having less than 2,500 acres within its boundaries, having less than 100 electors residing within it, and having only three divisions may abolish the divisions in it pursuant to this article.

Any district having not more than 15 freeholders who are voters shall have no divisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 454, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

21576.

The board of the district may petition the board of supervisors of the principal county for an order by the board of supervisors abolishing the divisions in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21577.

The board of supervisors shall thereupon find whether or not there are less than 2,500 acres in the district, less than 100 electors residing in it, and only three divisions in it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 454, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21578.

If the board of supervisors finds as to all of such matters in the affirmative, it may order that there shall be no divisions in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21579.

Upon the making of the order, there shall be no divisions in the district, the directors of the district need only be voters and freeholders in the district, and the directors of the district shall be elected, and appointed to fill vacancies, at large from the whole district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21580.

From the adoption of the order the district shall have three directors, and the offices of the directors shall have the numbers formerly identifying the division represented by each director, or if none, last incumbent director, and candidates for election for director shall be nominated and elected for a particular office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21581.

The making of the order does not change any term of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21582.

At least 120 days before any general district election a majority of the electors in the district having no divisions may file in the district office a petition signed by them requesting the board to establish divisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

21583.

The petition shall contain a showing that it is expedient to divide the district into three divisions as nearly equal in area and population as may be practicable and to elect the directors of the district therefrom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21584.

The board may independently investigate whether or not the facts are consistent with the showing made in the petition and shall hear any evidence produced to sustain or disprove the showing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21585.

Within 30 days after the filing of the petition the board shall find whether or not it is expedient to divide the district into three divisions as nearly equal in area and population as may be practicable and to elect the directors of the district therefrom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21586.

If the board finds in the affirmative, it shall forthwith order the establishment of divisions in the district and divide the district into three divisions as nearly equal in area and population as may be practicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21587.

At the general district election next following the making of the order directors shall be elected at large in the district, one director to represent each division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

21605.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subdivision (b) applies to districts in which directors are elected by divisions.

(b) The board of directors shall, by resolution, adjust the boundaries of any divisions pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 22000) of Division 21 of the Elections Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 21065 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 557.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Division and Precinct Boundaries [21606. - 21608.]

21606.

When land is excluded from a district after its formation, if the board deems it desirable, but not less than 120 days before any election in the district, it may reestablish the boundaries of the divisions within the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1045, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

21607.

When land is included within a district after its formation, its board shall, not less than 120 days before any election in the district, reestablish the boundaries of the divisions within the district so as to include the included land therein and so as to make the divisions as nearly equal in size and population as may be practicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1045, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

21608.

When land is included within a district after its formation and less than 120 days before an election, the voters in the area included shall not be entitled to vote at the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1045, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Bond Elections [21925. - 21935.]

21925.

After an order determining the amount of bonds which should be issued, the board shall call a bond election to submit to the voters a proposal of whether or not bonds in the amount determined in the order should be authorized when either:

(a) The board so determines.

(b) The board receives a petition requesting the election signed by either:

(1) A majority in number of the holders of title to land who are also the holders of title to a majority in value of all of the land.

(2) Five hundred or more persons, each of whom is either an elector or a holder of title to land and which petitioners include the holders of title to not less than 20 per cent in value of all of the land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21926.

Notice of a bond election shall be given by publication of the notice, in some newspaper published in the office county, once a week for at least three successive weeks.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 667.)
-------------------------------------------

21927.

Notice of a bond election shall specify:

(a) The day, hours, and polling places in each precinct for holding the election.

(b) The amount of bonds proposed to be issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21928.

At a bond election several proposals as to the issuance of bonds may be submitted separately on the same ballot if:

(a) Estimates of the cost of the respective projects have been made.

(b) The commission has reported thereon.

(c) The respective proposals have been stated in the notices of the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21929.

The ballots shall contain a general statement of the proposals to be voted on, including the amount of bonds proposed to be issued for each purpose, but an informality in the statement shall not vitiate the election. To the right of or below each proposal, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 38.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

21930.

Bond election ballots shall include instructions to voters that are consistent with the requirements of Section 13204 of the Elections Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 40.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

21931.

The voters shall vote for or against any proposal at a bond election by completely selecting the voting target next to either “Yes” or “No,” respectively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 41.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

21932.

Bond elections shall be held and the result determined and declared as nearly as practicable in conformity with general district elections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

21933.

The issuance of bonds is authorized when, at a bond election, any of the following occurs:

(a) Two-thirds of the votes cast on the proposal are “yes.”

(b) A majority of the votes cast on the proposal are “yes” when the election was called pursuant to a petition sufficient to require it to be called.

(c) A majority of the votes cast on the proposal are “Yes” when the bonds to be issued are payable both as to principal and interest solely from revenue and not directly or indirectly from assessments and the board finds that in its judgment the proposed revenues will each year, after deducting a reasonable allowance for the cost of operation and maintenance, if any, which must be paid from the revenues, be at least one and one-tenth times the debt service requirements for that year for principal, interest, sinking funds and reserve funds of all the bonds, including the bonds to be issued, payable from the revenues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

21934.

If the number of votes for any bond proposal is less than the number required to authorize the issuance of the bonds, the result of the vote shall be entered of record. The proposal may be again submitted at a bond election upon the presentation to the board of a petition for the subsequent election signed as required for the calling of the previous election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21935.

No informalities in the conduct of the election shall invalidate the election if fairly conducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. POWERS AND PURPOSES [22075. - 22982.]



  CHAPTER 1. Powers and Purposes Generally [22075. - 22186.]



  ARTICLE 1. Water [22075. - 22079.]

22075.

A district may do any act necessary to furnish sufficient water in the district for any beneficial use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22076.

A district may do any act in order to put to any beneficial use any water under its control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22077.

A district may deliver water for fire protection purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22078.

A district may control, distribute, store, spread, sink, treat, purify, recapture and salvage any water including but not limited to sewage waters for the beneficial use or uses of the district or its inhabitants or the owners of rights to waters therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 719.)
-------------------------------------------

22078.5.

A district may impose a special tax pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The special taxes shall be applied uniformly to all taxpayers or all real property within the district, except that unimproved property may be taxed at a lower rate than improved property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 70, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

22079.

No district furnishing water for residential use to a tenant shall seek to recover any charges or penalties for the furnishing of water to or for the tenant’s residential use from any subsequent tenant on account of nonpayment of charges by a previous tenant. The district may, however, require that service to subsequent tenants be furnished on the account of the landlord or property owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1251, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Watermaster Service [22080. - 22089.5.]

22080.

As used in this article:

(a) “Conduit” includes ditches, pipelines, and other means of diversion.
